New York, session 2025-2026, A10544.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The veterans' services law is amended by adding a new 2 section 29-f to read as follows: 3 § 29-f. Veteran status question on forms. Any form created by any 4 department, division, board, bureau, commission, office, agency, author- 5 ity or public corporation of the state which is available to the public 6 for submission to such department, division, board, bureau, commission, 7 office, agency, authority or public corporation of the state shall 8 include: 9 1. a question as to if the person completing the form is a veteran or 10 resides with a veteran. 11 2. a question as to whether the person completing the form would 12 consent to the agency sharing their contact information with the depart- 13 ment regarding resources available to veterans. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 15 ing the date upon which it shall have become a law. Effective immediate- 16 ly, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation 17 necessary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 18 authorized to be made and completed on or before such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06194-03-6